North Dakota, session 69, HB1077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 11 of section 54-52-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
11. "National guard security officer or firefighter" means a participating member who is:
a. A security police employee of the North Dakota national guard; or
b. A security officer employee of the North Dakota national guard; or
c. A firefighter employee of the North Dakota national guard.

H. B. NO. 1077 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1077.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 4 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State